Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 13.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1234
Violations; duty of officers upon discovery.

It shall be the duty of the county boards and county assessors to notify the county attorney of the proper county of all willful violations of the provisions with respect to listing of taxable tangible personal property for taxation known to them or any of them.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 54, p. 403;

Laws 1909, c. 111, § 1, p. 439;

R.S.1913, § 6341;

C.S.1922, § 5943;

C.S.1929, § 77-1430;

R.S.1943, § 77-1234;

Laws 1947, c. 250, § 18, p. 794;

Laws 1997, LB 397, § 11;

Laws 2004, LB 973, § 16;

Laws 2008, LB965, § 13.